Nebraska, session 109, LB714.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB714 LB714
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-3,186, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
60-3,186 (1) The department shall annually determine the motor
vehicle tax on each motor vehicle registered pursuant to section 60-3,187
and shall cause a notice of the amount to be delivered to the registrant.
The notice may be delivered to the registrant at the address shown upon
his or her registration certificate or the registrant's most recent
address according to information received by the department from the
National Change of Address program of the United States Postal Service or
delivered electronically to the registrant if the registrant has provided
electronic contact information to the department. The notice shall be
provided on or before the first day of the last month of the registration
period.
(2)(a) The motor vehicle tax, motor vehicle fee, registration fee,
sales tax, and any other applicable taxes and fees shall be paid to the
county treasurer prior to the registration of the motor vehicle for the
following registration period. If the motor vehicle being registered has
been transferred as a gift or for a nominal amount, any sales tax owed by
the transferor on the purchase of the motor vehicle shall have been paid
or be paid to the county treasurer prior to the registration of the motor
vehicle for the following registration period.
(b) After retaining two one percent of the motor vehicle tax
proceeds collected for costs incurred by the county treasurer, and after
transferring one and three-tenths of one percent of the motor vehicle tax
proceeds collected to the State Treasurer for credit to the Vehicle Title
and Registration System Replacement and Maintenance Cash Fund, the
remaining motor vehicle tax proceeds shall be allocated to each county,
local school system, school district, city, and village in the tax
district in which the motor vehicle has situs.
(c)(i) Forty Twenty-two percent of the remaining motor vehicle tax
proceeds shall be allocated to the county, (ii) thirty-seven sixty
-2-

LB714 LB714
2025 2025
percent shall be allocated to the local school system or school district,
and (iii) twenty-three eighteen percent shall be allocated to the city or
village, except that (A) if the tax district is not in a city or village,
sixty-three forty percent shall be allocated to the county, and (B) in
counties containing a city of the metropolitan class, thirty-eight
eighteen percent shall be allocated to the county and twenty-five twenty-
two percent shall be allocated to the city or village.
(d) The amount allocated to a local school system shall be
distributed to school districts in the same manner as property taxes.
(3) Proceeds from the motor vehicle tax shall be treated as property
tax revenue for purposes of expenditure limitations, matching of state or
federal funds, and other purposes.
Sec. 2. Section 60-3,187, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,187 (1) The motor vehicle tax schedules are set out in this
section.
(2) The motor vehicle tax shall be calculated by multiplying the
base tax times the fraction which corresponds to the age category of the
vehicle as shown in the following table:
YEAR FRACTION
First 1.00
Second 0.80
Second 0.90
Third 0.60
Third 0.80
Fourth 0.50
Fourth 0.70
Fifth 0.40
Fifth 0.60
Sixth 0.35
Sixth 0.51
-3-

LB714 LB714
2025 2025
Seventh 0.30
Seventh 0.42
Eighth 0.25
Eighth 0.33
Ninth 0.20
Ninth 0.24
Tenth and Eleventh 0.13
Tenth and Eleventh 0.15
Twelfth and Thirteenth 0.05
Twelfth and Thirteenth 0.07
Fourteenth and older 0.01
Fourteenth and older 0.00
(3) The base tax shall be:
(a) Automobiles, autocycles, and motorcycles — An amount determined
using the following table:
Value when new Base tax
Up to $3,999 $ 25
$4,000 to $5,999 35
$6,000 to $7,999 45
$8,000 to $9,999 60
$10,000 to $11,999 100
$12,000 to $13,999 140
$14,000 to $15,999 180
$16,000 to $17,999 220
$18,000 to $19,999 260
$20,000 to $21,999 300
$22,000 to $23,999 340
$24,000 to $25,999 380
$26,000 to $27,999 420
$28,000 to $29,999 460
-4-

LB714 LB714
2025 2025
$30,000 to $31,999 500
$32,000 to $33,999 540
$34,000 to $35,999 580
$36,000 to $37,999 620
$38,000 to $39,999 660
$40,000 to $41,999 700
$42,000 to $43,999 740
$44,000 to $45,999 780
$46,000 to $47,999 820
$48,000 to $49,999 860
$50,000 to $51,999 900
$52,000 to $53,999 940
$54,000 to $55,999 980
$56,000 to $57,999 1,020
$58,000 to $59,999 1,060
$60,000 to $61,999 1,100
$62,000 to $63,999 1,140
$64,000 to $65,999 1,180
$66,000 to $67,999 1,220
$68,000 to $69,999 1,260
$70,000 to $71,999 1,300
$72,000 to $73,999 1,340
$74,000 to $75,999 1,380
$76,000 to $77,999 1,420
$78,000 to $79,999 1,460
$80,000 to $81,999 1,500
$82,000 to $83,999 1,540
$84,000 to $85,999 1,580
$86,000 to $87,999 1,620
$88,000 to $89,999 1,660
-5-

LB714 LB714
2025 2025
$90,000 to $91,999 1,700
$92,000 to $93,999 1,740
$94,000 to $95,999 1,780
$96,000 to $97,999 1,820
$98,000 to $99,999 1,860
$100,000 to $101,999 1,900
$100,000 and over 1,900
$102,000 to $103,999 1,940
$104,000 to $105,999 1,980
$106,000 to $107,999 2,020
$108,000 to $109,999 2,060
$110,000 to $111,999 2,100
$112,000 to $113,999 2,140
$114,000 to $115,999 2,180
$116,000 to $117,999 2,220
$118,000 to $119,999 2,260
$120,000 to $121,999 2,300
$122,000 to $123,999 2,340
$124,000 to $125,999 2,380
$126,000 to $127,999 2,420
$128,000 to $129,999 2,460
$130,000 to $131,999 2,500
$132,000 to $133,999 2,540
$134,000 to $135,999 2,580
$136,000 to $137,999 2,620
$138,000 to $139,999 2,660
$140,000 to $141,999 2,700
$142,000 to $143,999 2,740
$144,000 to $145,999 2,780
$146,000 to $147,999 2,820
-6-

LB714 LB714
2025 2025
$148,000 to $149,999 2,860
$150,000 to $151,999 2,900
$152,000 to $153,999 2,940
$154,000 to $155,999 2,980
$156,000 to $157,999 3,020
$158,000 to $159,999 3,060
$160,000 to $161,999 3,100
$162,000 to $163,999 3,140
$164,000 to $165,999 3,180
$166,000 to $167,999 3,220
$168,000 to $169,999 3,260
$170,000 to $171,999 3,300
$172,000 to $173,999 3,340
$174,000 to $175,999 3,380
$176,000 to $177,999 3,420
$178,000 to $179,999 3,460
$180,000 to $181,999 3,500
$182,000 to $183,999 3,540
$184,000 to $185,999 3,580
$186,000 to $187,999 3,620
$188,000 to $189,999 3,660
$190,000 to $191,999 3,700
$192,000 to $193,999 3,740
$194,000 to $195,999 3,780
$196,000 to $197,999 3,820
$198,000 to $199,999 3,860
$200,000 and over 3,900
(b) Assembled automobiles — $60
(c) Assembled motorcycles other than autocycles — $25
(d) Cabin trailers, up to one thousand pounds — $10
-7-

LB714 LB714
2025 2025
(e) Cabin trailers, one thousand pounds and over and less than two
thousand pounds — $25
(f) Cabin trailers, two thousand pounds and over — $40
(g) Recreational vehicles, less than eight thousand pounds — $160
(h) Recreational vehicles, eight thousand pounds and over and less
than twelve thousand pounds — $410
(i) Recreational vehicles, twelve thousand pounds and over — $860
(j) Assembled recreational vehicles and buses shall follow the
schedules for body type and registered weight
(k) Trucks — Over seven tons and less than ten tons — $360
(l) Trucks — Ten tons and over and less than thirteen tons — $560
(m) Trucks — Thirteen tons and over and less than sixteen tons —
$760
(n) Trucks — Sixteen tons and over and less than twenty-five tons —
$960
(o) Trucks — Twenty-five tons and over — $1,160
(p) Buses — $360
(q) Trailers other than semitrailers — $10
(r) Semitrailers — $110
(s) Former military vehicles — $50
(t) Minitrucks — $50
(u) Low-speed vehicles — $50
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, truck means all
trucks and combinations of trucks except those trucks, trailers, or
combinations thereof registered under section 60-3,198, and the tax is
based on the gross vehicle weight rating as reported by the manufacturer.
(5) Current model year vehicles are designated as first-year motor
vehicles for purposes of the schedules.
(6) When a motor vehicle is registered which is newer than the
current model year by the manufacturer's designation, the motor vehicle
is subject to the initial motor vehicle tax in the first registration
-8-

LB714 LB714
2025 2025
period and ninety-five percent of the initial motor vehicle tax in the
second registration period.
(7) Assembled cabin trailers, assembled recreational vehicles, and
assembled buses shall be designated as sixth-year motor vehicles in their
first year of registration for purposes of the schedules.
(8) When a motor vehicle is registered which is required to have a
title branded as previous salvage pursuant to section 60-174, the motor
vehicle tax shall be reduced by twenty-five percent.
Sec. 3. Section 60-3,190, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,190 (1) A motor vehicle fee is imposed on all motor vehicles
registered for operation in this state. An owner of a motor vehicle which
is exempt from the imposition of a motor vehicle tax pursuant to section
60-3,185 shall also be exempt from the imposition of the motor vehicle
fee imposed pursuant to this section.
(2) The department shall annually determine the motor vehicle fee on
each motor vehicle registered pursuant to this section and shall cause a
notice of the amount to be delivered to the registrant. The notice shall
be combined with the notice of the motor vehicle tax required by section
60-3,186.
(3) The motor vehicle fee schedules are set out in this subsection
and subsection (4) of this section. Except for automobiles with a value
when new of less than $20,000, and for assembled, reconstructed-
designated, and replica-designated automobiles, the fee shall be
calculated by multiplying the base fee times the fraction which
corresponds to the age category of the automobile as shown in the
following table:
YEAR FRACTION
First through fifth 1.00
Sixth through tenth .70
Eleventh and over .35
-9-

LB714 LB714
2025 2025
(4) The base fee shall be:
(a) Automobiles, with a value when new of less than $20,000, and
assembled, reconstructed-designated, and replica-designated automobiles —
$20 $5
(b) Automobiles, with a value when new of $20,000 through $39,999 —
$40 $20
(c) Automobiles, with a value when new of $40,000 or more — $60 $30
(d) Motorcycles and autocycles — $20 $10
(e) Recreational vehicles and cabin trailers — $60 $10
(f) Trucks over seven tons and buses — $60, plus $2 for each whole
ton over seven tons $30
(g) Trailers other than semitrailers — $20 $10
(h) Semitrailers — $60 $30
(i) Former military vehicles — $20 $10
(j) Minitrucks — $20 $10
(k) Low-speed vehicles — $20 $10.
(5) The motor vehicle tax, motor vehicle fee, and registration fee
shall be paid to the county treasurer prior to the registration of the
motor vehicle for the following registration period. After retaining two
one percent of the motor vehicle fee collected for costs, the remaining
proceeds shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Motor
Vehicle Fee Fund. The State Treasurer shall return funds from the Motor
Vehicle Fee Fund remitted by a county treasurer which are needed for
refunds or credits authorized by law.
(6)(a) The Motor Vehicle Fee Fund is created. On or before the last
day of each calendar quarter, the State Treasurer shall distribute all
funds in the Motor Vehicle Fee Fund as follows: (i) Seventy Fifty percent
to the county treasurer of each county, amounts in the same proportion as
the most recent allocation received by each county from the Highway
Allocation Fund; and (ii) thirty fifty percent to the treasurer of each
municipality, amounts in the same proportion as the most recent
-10-

LB714 LB714
2025 2025
allocation received by each municipality from the Highway Allocation
Fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(b) Funds from the Motor Vehicle Fee Fund shall be considered local
revenue available for matching state sources.
(c) All receipts by counties and municipalities from the Motor
Vehicle Fee Fund shall be used for road, bridge, and street purposes.
(7) For purposes of subdivisions (4)(a), (b), (c), and (f) of this
section, automobiles or trucks includes all trucks and combinations of
trucks or truck-tractors, except those trucks, trailers, or semitrailers
registered under section 60-3,198, and the fee is based on the gross
vehicle weight rating as reported by the manufacturer.
(8) Current model year vehicles are designated as first-year motor
vehicles for purposes of the schedules.
(9) When a motor vehicle is registered which is newer than the
current model year by the manufacturer's designation, the motor vehicle
is subject to the initial motor vehicle fee for six registration periods.
(10) Assembled vehicles other than assembled, reconstructed-
designated, or replica-designated automobiles shall follow the schedules
for the motor vehicle body type.
Sec. 4. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 5. Original sections 60-3,186, 60-3,187, and 60-3,190, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-11-